Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202537-708.01
Rule or regulation; validity; review of other orders or acts; procedure.

(1) The validity of any rule or regulation adopted by the commission pursuant to sections 37-701 to 37-708 may be determined pursuant to section 84-911.

(2) Any person aggrieved by any other order or act of the commission pursuant to its authority under sections 37-701 to 37-708 may, within thirty days after notice thereof, file a petition in the district court of the county in which the aggrieved person resides or, if the aggrieved person is not a resident of Nebraska, in the district court of Lancaster County, for review. The court shall summarily hear the petition as a case in equity without a jury and may order only declaratory or prospective injunctive relief with regard to such order or act.

(3) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the appeal procedures described in the Administrative Procedure Act shall not apply to actions taken pursuant to sections 37-701 to 37-708.

(4) The appeal procedures described in sections 61-206 and 61-207 do not apply to actions taken pursuant to sections 37-701 to 37-708.

Laws 2004, LB 826, § 5;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 58.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.